Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-14] Federal funds outside of state
treasury. Notwithstanding chapter 38, the authority may establish and
manage federal funds outside of the state treasury to be used for federal
housing programs. The authority shall invest the funds in permitted
investments in accordance with chapter 36. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next